Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 3 Use and Application of Pesticides
2-7-107.
Inspections; search warrants; injunctions.

For the purpose of carrying out this article, the Commissioner may enter upon any public or private premises, at reasonable times, in order to:

Have access for the purpose of inspecting any equipment subject to this article;

Inspect or sample lands actually or reported to be exposed to pesticides;

Inspect storage or disposal areas;

Inspect or investigate complaints of injury to humans or land;

Sample pesticides being applied or to be applied; or

Observe the use and application of any pesticide.

Should the Commissioner be denied access to any land, where such access was sought for the purposes set forth in this article, he may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access to such land for such purposes. Upon such application, the court may issue a search warrant for the purposes requested.

The Commissioner is charged with the duty of enforcing the requirements of this article and the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder.

In addition to any other remedy provided in this article, the Commissioner is authorized to bring an action to enjoin a violation of any provision of this article or any rule or regulation promulgated hereunder. In such an action it shall not be necessary for the Commissioner to allege or prove the absence of an adequate remedy at law.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 849, § 21; Ga. L. 1976, p. 369, § 23; Ga. L. 1980, p. 749, §§ 4, 5.

2-7-108.
Subpoena powers.

The Commissioner may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, documents, and records anywhere in this state in any hearing affecting the authority or privilege granted by a license, certification, or permit issued under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 849, § 20; Ga. L. 1976, p. 369, § 22.

2-7-109.
Judicial review of Commissioner’s actions.

Any person aggrieved by any action of the Commissioner may obtain judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 849, § 17; Ga. L. 1976, p. 369, § 19.

2-7-110.
Reports of pesticide accidents; claim of damage; notification; inspection; effect of failure to file; failure to permit observation as bar to claim.

The Commissioner by regulation may require the reporting of significant pesticide accidents or incidents.

Any person claiming damages from a pesticide application shall file with the Commissioner, on a form prescribed by the Commissioner, a written statement claiming that he has been damaged. This report shall be filed within 60 days after the date that damages occur. If a growing crop is alleged to have been damaged, the report must be filed prior to the time that 25 percent of the crop has been harvested. Such statement shall contain, but shall not be limited to, the name of the person allegedly responsible for the application of the pesticide, the name of the owner or lessee of the land on which the crop is grown and for which damage is alleged to have occurred, and the date on which the alleged damage occurred. The Commissioner shall prepare a form to be furnished for use in such cases. Such form shall also contain such other requirements as the Commissioner may deem proper. Upon receipt of such statement, the Commissioner shall notify the licensee and the owner or lessee of the land or other person who may be charged with responsibility for the damages claimed and shall furnish such copies of the statement as may be requested. The Commissioner shall inspect damages whenever possible. When he determines that a complaint has sufficient merit, he shall make such information available to the person claiming damages and to the person who is alleged to have caused the damage.

The filing of a report as prescribed in subsection (b) of this Code section or the failure to file such a report need not be alleged in any complaint which might be filed in a court of law; nor shall the failure to file a report be considered any bar to the maintenance of any criminal or civil action.

The failure to file a report as prescribed in subsection (b) of this Code section shall not be a violation of this article. However, if the person failing to file such report is the only one injured from the use or application of a pesticide by others, the Commissioner, when in the public interest, may refuse to hold a hearing for the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license or permit issued under this article until such report is filed.

Where damage is alleged to have occurred, the claimant shall permit the Commissioner and the licensee and his representatives, including the bondsman and the insurer, to observe, within reasonable hours, the lands or nontarget organism alleged to have been damaged, in order that such damage may be examined. Failure of the claimant to permit such observation and examination of the damaged lands shall automatically bar the claim against the licensee.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 849, § 11; Ga. L. 1976, p. 369, § 13.

2-7-111.
Applicability of article to governmental entities; liability of such entities.

All state agencies, municipal corporations, and other governmental agencies shall be subject to this article and rules adopted hereunder concerning the application and use of pesticides.

Employees of agencies listed in subsection (a) of this Code section who use or supervise the use of restricted use pesticides restricted to use by certified applicators or state restricted pesticide uses restricted to use by certified applicators shall be subject to the requirements provided for in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 2-7-99, provided that the Commissioner shall issue a limited license without a fee to such public applicator who has qualified for such license. Such license shall be valid only when such applicator is acting as an applicator applying or supervising application of pesticides used by such entities. Government research personnel shall be exempt from this licensing requirement when applying pesticides, other than restricted use pesticides restricted to use by certified applicators or state restricted pesticide uses restricted to use by certified applicators, to experimental plots only. Individuals licensed pursuant to this subsection shall be certified commercial applicators for the use of “restricted use pesticides” covered by the applicant’s classification.

Such governmental agencies and municipal corporations shall be subject to legal recourse by any person damaged by the application of any pesticide. Such action may be brought in the county where the damage or some part thereof occurred.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 369, § 8.

2-7-112.
Exemptions from article.

Farmers. Code Section 2-7-99, relating to licenses and requirements for their issuance, shall not apply to any farmer applying pesticides classified for general use for himself or for his farmer neighbors, provided that:

He operates farm property and operates and maintains pesticide application equipment primarily for his own use;

He is not regularly engaged in the business of applying pesticides for hire, amounting to a principal or regular occupation, and he does not publicly hold himself out as a pesticide contractor; and

He operates his pesticide application equipment only in the vicinity of his own property and for the accommodation of his neighbors.

Veterinarians. Paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 2-7-99, relating to license and requirements for their issuance, shall not apply to a doctor of veterinary medicine applying pesticides to animals during the normal course of his veterinary practice, provided that he is not regularly engaged in the business of applying pesticides for hire, amounting to a principal or regular occupation, and does not publicly hold himself out as a pesticide contractor.

Experimental research. Code Section 2-7-99, relating to licenses and requirements for their issuance, shall not apply to research personnel applying pesticides, other than restricted use pesticides restricted to use by certified applicators or state restricted pesticide uses restricted to use by certified applicators, only to bona fide experimental plots.

Persons subject to Structural Pest Control Act. Persons subject to Chapter 45 of Title 43, the “Structural Pest Control Act,” are exempt from this article and the regulations issued hereunder with respect to any activities which are regulated under Chapter 45 of Title 43.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 849, § 15; Ga. L. 1976, p. 369, § 17.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, “Georgia” was deleted preceding “Structural Pest Control Act” in subsection (d).

2-7-113.
Effect of article on certain other laws.

No provision of this article shall authorize any person to violate any of the provisions of any law or any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder, the administration and enforcement of which is assigned to the Department of Natural Resources or any division therein or to the Coastal Marshlands Protection Committee. This article shall not be construed as repealing, preempting, modifying, or limiting the authority or functions assigned to the Department of Natural Resources or its divisions or officials or to the Coastal Marshlands Protection Committee.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 369, § 25.

2-7-113.1.
Local regulation of pesticides prohibited; variances from rule or regulation of Commissioner of Agriculture.

No county, municipal corporation, consolidated government, or other political subdivision of this state shall adopt or continue in effect any ordinance, rule, regulation, or resolution relating to pesticide use, sale, distribution, storage, transportation, disposal, formulation, labeling, registration, or manufacture. This provision shall in no way prohibit or impair the legal right of any county, municipal corporation, consolidated government, or other political subdivision of this state to issue business licenses or to make zoning decisions.

The governing authority of any county or municipality may, by resolution, petition the Commissioner of Agriculture for a variance from a rule or regulation of the Commissioner because of special circumstances relating to the use or application of a pesticide. If such a petition is received by the Commissioner, it shall be the duty of the Commissioner to notify the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the Agriculture and Consumer Affairs Committee and Natural Resources and the Environment Committee of the Senate and the Agriculture and Consumer Affairs Committee and the Natural Resources and Environment Committee of the House of Representatives that such petition has been received. The Commissioner shall conduct a public hearing on such petition and issue a decision on the requested variance within 60 days of the receipt of the petition. If a decision is not given within 60 days of the receipt of the petition, the variance shall automatically be granted. The Commissioner may grant a variance requested under this subsection with or without changes.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-7-113.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 3162, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 2/HB 117; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 2/HB 142.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 20/HB 117, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act is intended to reflect the current internal organization of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives and is not otherwise intended to change substantive law. In the event of a conflict with any other Act of the 2009 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act.”

2-7-114.
Penalties.

Any person violating any provision of this article or any regulation adopted hereunder shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 849, § 19; Ga. L. 1976, p. 369, § 21.